Utah statutes.
10-9a-301.   Ordinance establishing planning commission required -- Ordinance requirements -- Compensation.

(1) (a)  Each municipality shall enact an ordinance establishing a planning commission.

(b)  The ordinance shall define:

(i)  the number and terms of the members and, if the municipality chooses, alternate members;

(ii)  the mode of appointment;

(iii)  the procedures for filling vacancies and removal from office;

(iv)  the authority of the planning commission;

(v)  subject to Subsection (1)(c), the rules of order and procedure for use by the planning commission in a public meeting; and

(vi)  other details relating to the organization and procedures of the planning commission.

(c)  Subsection (1)(b)(v) does not affect the planning commission's duty to comply with Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.

(2)  The legislative body may fix per diem compensation for the members of the planning commission, based on necessary and reasonable expenses and on meetings actually attended.

